Arkansas, session 2025, SB431.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-1-109(a)(1), concerning offenses for
which prosecution may be commenced at any time, is amended to add additional
subdivisions to read as follows:
(O) Sexual extortion, § 5-14-113, if the victim was a
minor at the time of the offense;
(P) Trafficking of persons, § 5-18-103;
(Q) Patronizing a victim of human trafficking, § 5-18-104;
(R) Grooming a minor for future sex trafficking, § 5-18-
*CEB069*
04-09-2025 16:43:35 CEB069

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 H4/9/25 SB431
106; and
(S) Traveling for the purpose of an unlawful sex act with
a minor, § 5-18-107.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-2-210 is amended to read as follows:
5-2-210. Human trafficking — Affirmative defense.
(a) As used in this section, "victim of trafficking of persons" means
a person who has been subjected to trafficking of persons, § 5-18-103.
(b) It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution for an offense
listed under subsection (c) of this section if at the time a person engaged
in the conduct charged to constitute the offense the person was:
(1) A Was a victim of trafficking of persons, § 5-18-103; and
(2) Engaged in the offense as a result of the trafficking of
persons, § 5-18-103.
(c) The affirmative defense under this section subsection (b) of this
section may be raised only in a prosecution for one (1) or more of the
following offenses:
(1) Forgery, § 5-37-201;
(2) Defrauding a prospective adoptive parent, § 5-37-216;
(3) A prostitution offense under § 5-70-101 et seq.;
(4) Obscene performance at a live public show, § 5-68-305; or
(5) A controlled substance offense under § 5-64-401 et seq. that
is not a Class Y felony.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 27, Subchapter 3, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-27-308. Possession, manufacture, transport, or distribution of child
sex doll.
(a) As used in this section, "child sex doll" means an anatomically
correct or anatomically precise doll, mannequin, or robot that may consist of
an entire body, or may consist of only a pelvis or any other body part, with
features of, or with features that resemble, those of a minor intended for
use in sexual acts.
(b) It is unlawful for a person to knowingly:
(1) Possess a child sex doll;
(2) Transport a child sex doll into the state;
04-09-2025 16:43:35 CEB069

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 H4/9/25 SB431
(3) Distribute a child sex doll; or
(4) Manufacture a child sex doll.
(c) A violation of this section is:
(1) A Class D felony under subdivision (b)(1) of this section;
(2) A Class C felony under subdivision (b)(2) or (b)(3) of this
section; or
(3) A Class B felony under subdivision (b)(4) of this section.

/s/J. Bryant



























04-09-2025 16:43:35 CEB069